Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3748
Commission; members; terms.

The term of a member of the commission shall be three years and until his or her successor is appointed
and qualified. No member shall serve more than three consecutive
three-year terms.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 219, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB394, § 4.